Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 22.2 Biliteracy Seal

16-22.2-1.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature to encourage excellence for all pupils, and the legislature wishes to publicly recognize pupils for exemplary achievements in academic studies.

The study of languages other than English in elementary and secondary schools should be encouraged because it contributes to a pupil’s cognitive development and to our national economy and security.

Proficiency in multiple languages is critical in enabling Rhode Island to participate effectively in a global political, social, and economic context, and in expanding trade with other countries.

The demand for employees to be fluent in more than one language is increasing both in Rhode Island and throughout the world.

The benefits to employers in having staff fluent in more than one language are clear and include access to an expanded market; allowing business owners to better serve their customers’ needs; and the sparking of new marketing ideas that better target a particular audience and open a channel of communication with customers.

It is the intent of the legislature to promote linguistic proficiency and cultural literacy in one or more languages, in addition to English, and to provide recognition of the attainment of those needed and important skills through the establishment of the state seal of biliteracy. A state seal of biliteracy would be affixed on the high school diplomas and transcripts of graduating pupils attaining proficiency in one or more languages, in addition to English.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 111, § 1.

16-22.2-2.
State seal of biliteracy.

A state seal of biliteracy is established to recognize high school graduates who have attained a high level of proficiency in listening, speaking, reading, and writing in one or more languages, in addition to English. The state seal of biliteracy shall be awarded by the commissioner. School district participation in this program shall be voluntary.

The purposes of the state seal of biliteracy are as follows:

To encourage pupils to study languages;

To certify attainment of biliteracy;

To provide employers with a method of identifying people with language and biliteracy skills;

To provide universities with an additional method to recognize applicants seeking admission;

To prepare pupils with twenty-first century skills;

To recognize the value of foreign language, native language instruction, and multilingual education in public schools. For the purpose of this section, “foreign language” means any language other than English, including all modern languages, Latin, American sign language, native American languages, and native languages; and

To strengthen intergroup relationships, affirm the value of diversity, and honor the multiple cultures and languages of a community.

The state seal of biliteracy certifies attainment of a high level of proficiency by a graduating high school pupil in one or more languages, in addition to English.

The Seal of Biliteracy can be achieved at two (2) levels:

The Rhode Island Gold Seal of Biliteracy will be awarded to students who have demonstrated their ability to narrate and describe in past, present, and future in a world language. Their language functions allow them to deal effectively with unanticipated complications. The gold level is aligned with the ACTFL “Advanced Low” Proficiency Guidelines (2012).

Students will earn a Gold Seal of Biliteracy if they meet the performance standard on a world language assessment from the Rhode Island department of education (RIDE)-approved assessment list.

The Rhode Island Silver Seal of Biliteracy will be awarded to students who have demonstrated their ability to create with the language, ask and answer simple questions, and handle a simple transaction in a world language. The silver level is aligned with the ACTFL “Intermediate Mid” Proficiency Guidelines (2012).

Students will earn a Silver Seal of Biliteracy if they meet the performance standard on an English assessment and the silver-level performance standard on a world language assessment from the RIDE-approved assessment list.

The council on elementary and secondary education shall promulgate regulations of the commissioner as may be necessary to establish the criteria that students must achieve to earn a state seal of biliteracy, which may include, but shall not be limited to, attainment of units of credit in English language arts and languages other than English; passage of state assessments in English language arts and languages other than English; and passage of additional assessments of foreign language proficiency as may be approved by the commissioner for this purpose.

The commissioner shall do both of the following:

Prepare and deliver, to participating school districts, an appropriate insignia to be affixed to the diploma and transcript of the pupil indicating that the pupil has been awarded a state seal of biliteracy by the commissioner.

Provide other information they deem necessary for school districts to successfully participate in the program.

A school district that participates in the program under this section shall do both of the following:

Maintain appropriate records in order to identify pupils who have earned a state seal of biliteracy.

Affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma and transcript of each pupil who earns a state seal of biliteracy.

No fee shall be charged to a pupil pursuant to this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 399, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 400, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

16-22.2-3.
Earning college credit for the Seal of Biliteracy.

For admissions purposes, each public university and public community college in this state shall accept the state Silver Seal of Biliteracy and the Gold Seal of Biliteracy as world language coursework if taken during high school and if a student’s high school transcript indicates that he or she will be receiving or has received the state Seal of Biliteracy. The amount of world language coursework credit awarded would be based on the discretion of the respective public university and public community college.

Each public community college and public university in this state shall establish criteria to translate a state Silver and Gold Seal of Biliteracy into course credit based on world language course equivalencies identified by the community college’s or university’s faculty and staff and, upon request from an enrolled student, the community college or university shall award world language course credit toward a minor, major or concentration in the language or general education course credit to a student who has received a state Seal of Biliteracy. Students enrolled in a public community college or public university who have received a state Seal of Biliteracy must request course credit for their Seal within three (3) academic years after graduating from high school.

The criteria required pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall be publicly displayed on the website of each public university and each public community college by June 30, 2024.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 399, § 2, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 400, § 2, effective June 30, 2022.